South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S629.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 23-43-85(D) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (D) A single-family modular home used as a display model may be placed for its first residential use in this State if: (1) it bears a valid modular home label issued pursuant to this chapter; (2) it meets the appropriate wind and seismic requirements in effect when the label was issued; (3) it has not been altered from its original design; and (4) it was manufactured within five years before the placement for first residential use;  and (5)(4) the seller provides the purchaser with written notice that the home meets the appropriate code requirements in effect at the time of manufacture, and may or may not meet the code requirements in effect at the time of placement for residential use. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----